Massachusetts, session 194th, HD5731.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 21 of Chapter 2 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by striking out, in lines 1 and 2, the words: “‘Blue Hills of Massachusetts’
composed by Katherine E. Mullen of the town of Barre” and inserting in place thereof the
following words:- “‘Song of Massachusetts’ by Regie Gibson, the Commonwealth of
Massachusetts first Poet Laureate.”
of 1